Illinois, session 104th, HB4518.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 534-4 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/34-4)  (from Ch. 122, par. 34-4)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-457)8    Sec. 34-4. Eligibility. To be eligible for election or 9appointment to the Board, a person shall be a citizen of the 10United States, shall be a registered voter as provided in the 11Election Code, shall have been, for a period of one year 12immediately before election or appointment, a resident of the 13city, district, and subdistrict that the member represents, 14and shall not be a child sex offender as defined in Section 1511-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012. A person is ineligible for 16election or appointment to the Board if that person is not in 17compliance with the provisions of Section 10-9 as referenced 18in Section 34-3. For the 2024 general election, all persons 19eligible for election to the Board shall be nominated by a 20petition signed by at least 1,000 but not more than 3,000 of 21the voters residing within the electoral district on a 22petition in order to be placed on the ballot. For the 2026 23general election and general elections thereafter, persons   HB4518- 2 -LRB104 20372 JDS 33827 b1eligible for election to the Board shall be nominated by a 2petition signed by at least 500 but no more than 1,500 voters 3residing within the subdistrict on a petition in order to be 4placed on the ballot, except that persons eligible for 5election to the Board at large shall be nominated by a petition 6signed by no less than 2,500 voters residing within the city. 7Any registered voter may sign a nominating petition, 8irrespective of any partisan petition the voter signs or may 9sign. For the 2024 general election only, the petition 10circulation period shall begin on March 26, 2024, and the 11filing period shall be from June 17, 2024 to June 24, 2024. 12Permanent removal from the city by any member of the Board 13during the member's term of office constitutes a resignation 14therefrom and creates a vacancy in the Board. The Board may, by 15resolution, provide for the compensation of Board members. The 16compensation provided for Board members may include, but is 17not limited to, reimbursement Board members shall serve 18without any compensation; however, members of the Board shall 19be reimbursed for expenses incurred while in the performance 20of their duties upon submission of proper receipts or upon 21submission of a signed voucher in the case of an expense 22allowance evidencing the amount of such reimbursement or 23allowance to the President of the Board for verification and 24approval. Board members shall not hold other public office 25under the Federal, State or any local government other than 26that of Director of the Regional Transportation Authority,   HB4518- 3 -LRB104 20372 JDS 33827 b1member of the economic development commission of a city having 2a population exceeding 500,000, notary public or member of the 3National Guard, and by accepting any such office while members 4of the Board, or by not resigning any such office held at the 5time of being elected or appointed to the Board within 30 days 6after such election or appointment, shall be deemed to have 7vacated their membership in the Board.8(Source: P.A. 102-177, eff. 6-1-22; 102-691, eff. 12-17-21; 9103-584, eff. 3-18-24.) 10    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-457)11    Sec. 34-4. Eligibility. To be eligible for election or 12appointment to the Board, a person shall be a citizen of the 13United States, shall be a registered voter as provided in the 14Election Code, shall have been, for a period of one year 15immediately before election or appointment, a resident of the 16city, district, and subdistrict that the member represents, 17and shall not be a child sex offender as defined in Section 1811-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012. A person is ineligible for 19election or appointment to the Board if that person is not in 20compliance with the provisions of Section 10-9 as referenced 21in Section 34-3. For the 2024 general election, all persons 22eligible for election to the Board shall be nominated by a 23petition signed by at least 1,000 but not more than 3,000 of 24the voters residing within the electoral district on a 25petition in order to be placed on the ballot. For the 2026   HB4518- 4 -LRB104 20372 JDS 33827 b1general election and general elections thereafter, persons 2eligible for election to the Board shall be nominated by a 3petition signed by at least 500 but no more than 1,500 voters 4residing within the subdistrict on a petition in order to be 5placed on the ballot, except that persons eligible for 6election to the Board at large shall be nominated by a petition 7signed by no less than 2,500 voters residing within the city. 8Any registered voter may sign a nominating petition, 9irrespective of any partisan petition the voter signs or may 10sign. For the 2024 general election only, the petition 11circulation period shall begin on March 26, 2024, and the 12filing period shall be from June 17, 2024 to June 24, 2024. 13Permanent removal from the city by any member of the Board 14during the member's term of office constitutes a resignation 15therefrom and creates a vacancy in the Board. The Board may, by 16resolution, provide for the compensation of Board members. The 17compensation provided for Board members may include, but is 18not limited to, reimbursement Board members shall serve 19without any compensation; however, members of the Board shall 20be reimbursed for expenses incurred while in the performance 21of their duties upon submission of proper receipts or upon 22submission of a signed voucher in the case of an expense 23allowance evidencing the amount of such reimbursement or 24allowance to the President of the Board for verification and 25approval. Board members shall not hold other public office 26under the Federal, State or any local government other than   HB4518- 5 -LRB104 20372 JDS 33827 b1that of Director of the Northern Illinois Transit Authority, 2member of the economic development commission of a city having 3a population exceeding 500,000, notary public or member of the 4National Guard, and by accepting any such office while members 5of the Board, or by not resigning any such office held at the 6time of being elected or appointed to the Board within 30 days 7after such election or appointment, shall be deemed to have 8vacated their membership in the Board.9(Source: P.A. 103-584, eff. 3-18-24; 104-457, eff. 6-1-26.)